South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-11-320(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B)(1) Deer taken pursuant to individual deer tags, during any season regardless of weapon, must be tagged with a valid individual deer tag.  Each tag must be attached to the deer as prescribed by the department before the animal is moved from the point of kill. (2) Deer taken pursuant to Deer Quota Program tags must be tagged with a valid Deer Quota Program tag and reported to the electronic harvest reporting system pursuant to the provisions of Section 50-11-546.  Each tag must be attached to the deer as prescribed by the department before the animal is moved from the point of kill. (3) A person may use a printed copy of a tag to tag a downed deer while awaiting to receive a tag by mail. (4) A person must be in possession of a tag when tagging a deer, but not while hunting. SECTION 2.  Section 50-11-544 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 50-11-544. (A) A person who hunts wild turkeys is required to possess a wild turkey tag issued by the department when tagging a wild turkey, but not while hunting. All turkeys taken must be tagged before being moved from the point of kill. All tags must be validated as prescribed by the department before a turkey is moved from the point of kill. No resident may obtain or possess more than three wild turkey tags, and no nonresident may obtain or possess more than two wild turkey tags. (B) A person may use a printed copy of a tag to tag a downed wild turkey while awaiting to receive a tag by mail. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----